Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 297, O.S.L.
2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 6-401), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 6-401. A. As used in this section:
1. "Electronic or digital communication" includes, but is not
limited to, emails, text messages, instant messages, direct
messages, social media messages, messages sent through software
applications, and any other electronic or digital means of
communication; and
2. "School personnel" means teachers, coaches, administrators,
school bus drivers, or any other persons employed full-time or part-
time by a public school or charter school.
Req. No. 10761 Page 1

B. School personnel engaging in electronic or digital
communication with an individual student shall include the student's
parent or legal guardian in any electronic or digital communication,
unless such:
1. Such communication is on a school-approved platform and
related to school and academic communications; or
2. The student's parent or legal guardian opted out of being
included in the electronic or digital communication. A student's
parent or legal guardian may opt out of electronic or digital
communications related to school or academic communications from
identified school personnel. The parent or legal guardian shall be
required to renew their opt-out selections each academic year.
C. Exceptions to the requirement in subsection B of this
section may be made in case of an emergency, subject to subsequent
notification to the parent or legal guardian. School personnel
shall make reasonable efforts to use school-approved platforms,
systems, or applications that allow automatic inclusion of parents
or legal guardians in communications with students.
D. Schools shall provide training, developed by the State
Department of Education, for school personnel on the student
communication requirements of this section.
E. Any school personnel who is reported to be in violation of
subsection B of this section shall be put on administrative leave
while the school district investigates the incident and notifies the
Req. No. 10761 Page 2

boar d of education. If the investigation finds that no misconduct
occurred, the school personnel shall be reinstated and the incident
shall be noted in the school personnel's employee file. If the
investigation finds misconduct occurred, the school personnel shall
be disciplined according to the school district board of education's
policy, up to and including termination of employment, and the
incident shall be reported to law enforcement pursuant to Section
1210.163 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10761 AQH 01/14/25









Req. No. 10761 Page 3